Montana, session 2025, HB667.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Employer requirements -- employees -- public office. (1) In addition to the
requirements in 39-2-104, an employer may not prohibit or restrict an employee from seeking election or
appointment to a city, county, or state public office or retaliate or discriminate against an employee for seeking
election or appointment to a city, county, or state public office.
(2) During an employee's leave of absence while serving as an elected officer or while appointed
to a public office under 39-2-104, the employer may not require an employee:
(a) to use leave or benefits during the mandatory leave of absence without the consent of the
employee; or
(b) to perform work during the mandatory leave of absence.
(3) If the employer provides a company phone, computer, or phone number and the employer
allows the employee's personal use of the company phone, computer, or phone number, the employer may not
prohibit the employee's use of the phone, computer, or phone number during the leave of absence provided in
39-2-104.
(4) If the employer provides health care benefits to the employee, the employer shall continue
offering the employee health care benefits with the same covered benefits and covered persons, as those
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 667
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 667
terms are defined in 33-32-102, during the leave of absence provided for in 39-2-104.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
39, chapter 2, part 1, and the provisions of Title 39, chapter 2, part 1, apply to [section 1].
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
Section 4. Retroactive applicability. [This act] applies retroactively, within the meaning of 1-2-109,
to all occurrences on or after January 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 667
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 667, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 667
INTRODUCED BY E. BUTTREY
AN ACT REVISING LAWS RELATED TO EMPLOYERS WHOSE EMPLOYEES SEEK, ARE APPOINTED TO,
OR ARE ELECTED TO A PUBLIC OFFICE; PROHIBITING EMPLOYERS FROM RESTRICTING EMPLOYEES
FROM SEEKING ELECTION OR APPOINTMENT TO PUBLIC OFFICE; AND PROHIBITING AN EMPLOYER
FROM RESTRICTING CERTAIN EMPLOYEES WHO SERVE DURING A MANDATORY LEAVE OF ABSENCE
FOR PUBLIC OFFICE; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE AND A RETROACTIVE
APPLICABILITY DATE.”